Utah statutes.
63H-3-108.   Actions on validity or enforceability of bonds -- Time for bringing action.

(1)  In a suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of a bond issued under this chapter or the security for them, the bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority in connection with the Utah Science Center is conclusively considered to have been issued for that purpose.

(2) (a)  After receiving notice described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), a person may contest:

(i) (A)  the legality of a resolution;

(B)  notice of bonds to be issued; or

(C)  a provision made for the security and payment of the bonds; and

(ii)  for a period of 30 days after the publication of the resolution authorizing the bonds, or a notice of bonds to be issued by the authority containing those items described in Section 11-14-316:

(A)  in a newspaper having general circulation in the area of operation; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(b)  After the 30-day period no one has any cause of action to contest the regularity, formality, or legality of the notice of bonds to be issued or the bonds for any cause whatsoever.

